Washington statutes.
RCW 18.233.030

Issuance of license requirements.

The department shall issue a license to practice music therapy to an applicant who meets the following requirements:

(1) Is at least 18 years of age;

(2) Is in good standing in any other states [state] where the applicant is licensed or certified to practice music therapy;

(3) Submits sufficient documentation as determined by the department in rule and includes the following requirements:

(a) Completion of an academic and clinical training program for music therapy approved by the secretary, following consultation with the advisory committee and consideration of standards adopted by national certification boards for music therapy; and

(b) Successful completion of an examination administered or approved by the secretary, following consultation with the advisory committee and consideration of standards adopted by national certification boards for music therapy;

(4) Pays a fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 18.233.060.

(5) Meets any other qualifications as determined by the department in rule.

[ 2023 c 175 s 4.]